Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-317
Sexual assault; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to enact laws dealing with sexual assault and related criminal sexual offenses which will protect the dignity of the victim at all stages of judicial process, which will insure that the alleged offender in a criminal sexual offense case have preserved the constitutionally guaranteed due process of law procedures, and which will establish a system of investigation, prosecution, punishment, and rehabilitation for the welfare and benefit of the citizens of this state as such system is employed in the area of criminal sexual offenses.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 32.